th: ประเภทการติดตั้งจอภาพ: แบบรัดแขน; ตั้งพื้น; ผนัง; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Tipo de montagem do monitor: Braçadeira; Sem suporte; Parede; Outro
bg-BG: Тип монтаж на монитора: Лента за ръка; Свободностоящ; Стена; Други
zh-CN: 监视器安装类型: 臂环; 自力支撑; 墙; 其他
en: Monitor mounting type: Armband; Free-standing; Wall; Other
lt-LT: Monitoriaus tvirtinimo tipas: Su apyranke; Laisvai pastatomi; Siena; Kita
fi: Näytön kiinnitystyyppi: Käsivarsinauha; Vapaasti seisova; Seinä; Muu
da: Monteringstype for monitor: Armbind; Fritstående; Væg; Andet
ko: 모니터 장착 타입: 암밴드; 독립형; 벽; 기타
de: Monitor-Montagetyp: Armband; Freistehend; Wand; Sonstiges
es: Tipo de montaje del monitor: Brazalete; Independiente; Pared; Otros
fr: Type de fixation du moniteur: Brassard; Sur pied; Mur; Autre
sv: Typ av bildskärmsmontering: Armbindel; Fristående; Vägg; Annat
zh-TW: 螢幕安裝類型: 臂帶式; 獨立式; 牆; 其他
sk-SK: Typ montáže monitora: Náramok na ruku; Voľne stojaci; Stena; Iné
el: Τύπος τοποθέτησης οθόνης: Περιβραχιόνιο; Ελεύθερης τοποθέτησης; Τοίχος; Άλλο
tr: Monitör montaj tipi: Kol bandı; Bağımsız; Duvar; Diğer
pl: Rodzaj mocowania monitora: Opaska na ramię; Wolnostojący; Ściana; Pozostałe
cs: Typ montáže monitoru: Páska na paži; Volně stojící; Stěna; Jiné
hu: Monitor rögzítési típusa: Karpánt; Szabadon álló; Fali; Egyéb
nb: Monitormonteringstype: Armbånd; Frittstående; Vegg; Annen
pt-PT: Tipo de montagem de monitor: Braçadeira; Sem suporte; Parede; Outro
ja: モニタ取り付けタイプ: アームバンド; 自立型; 壁; その他
vi: Kiểu gắn màn hình: Băng đeo cánh tay; Đứng một mình; Tường; Khác
ro-RO: Tip de montare monitor: Banderolă; De sine stătător; Perete; Altele
hr-HR: Način postavljanja monitora: Traka za ruku; Samostojeći; Zidni; Ostalo
it: Tipo di montaggio del monitor: Fascia da braccio; Da posizionamento libero; Parete; Altro
sl-SI: Vrsta namestitve monitorja: Trak za roke; Prostostoječe; Na steni; Drugo
ru: Тип крепления монитора: Наручный; Отдельно стоящий; Настенный; Другой
nl: Type monitormontage: Armband; Vrijstaand; Muur; Andere